src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/sw-ke-g1-3.ctb
# liblouis: Swahili (Kenya) Grade 1.3
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-index-name: Swahili, contracted, grade 1.3
#-display-name: Swahili grade 1.3 contracted braille
#
#-author: Jake Kyle
#-author: Dipendra Manocha
#-author: Martin Kieti
#-maintainer: Jake Kyle <jake@compassbraille.org>
#-updated: 2022
#
#+language:sw
#+region:sw-KE
#+type:literary
#+grade:1.3
#+contraction: partial
#
#-copyright: 2022, Compass Braille <http://www.compassbraille.org>
#-copyright: 2022, the DAISY Consortium <https://daisy.org/>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Copyright (C) 2022 by Compass Braille <http://www.compassbraille.org>
# Copyright (C) 2022 by the DAISY Consortium <https://daisy.org/>
#
# With contributions from DAISY Consortium under project supported by Microsoft.
#
# This table was created using information contained in a document entitled
# "Kenya Swahili Braille Code" (see <http://liblouis.org/braille-specs/swahili/>)
# which was derived from the Kenya Institute of Curriculum Development's Swahili
# Braille Manual: “Mwongozo wa Breli Ya Kiswahili”.
#
# The Braille code is graded into 6 grades: 1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, 1.5 and 2. This is
# in line with the Kenya Institute of Curriculum Development’s Curriculum
# Designs for Kiswahili Braille. 
#
# The Braille code in the document was adopted at a Stakeholders Workshop held
# at the Swiss Lenana Mount Hotel on 25th August 2022.
#

include sw-ke-g1-2.ctb

# Single Cell Contractions

partword nd 1246
partword tw 156
partword kw 12345
partword ng 346
partword ny 12456
partword ch 16
partword gh 126
partword sw 12356
partword sh 146
partword th 1456
partword dh 2346
partword st 34
partword end 12346
partword mb 1346
partword mw 123456
partword nz 23456

# Apostrophe
always ng' 346-3
always ng'o 346-3-135

# Double Letter Contractions
# These double-letter contractions are used at all places, that is, at the
# beiginning, middle and end of a word.

partword aa 345
partword ee 26
partword ii 35
partword oo 246
partword uu 1256

# Contractions That Represent Whole Words 
# These contractions are used to represent whole words. When used, they should
# not be followed by another letter or word. However, they can be preceeded or
# followed by punctuations. 

word mwanafunzi 123456 mw
word swali 12356 sw
word chama 16 ch
word ghali 126 gh
word shule 146 sh
word thabiti 1456 th
word ndani 1246 nd
word starehe 34 st
word ngoma 346 ng
word nyama 12456 ny
word dhahabu 2346 dh
word twende 156 tw

# -- end of table --
